California statutes. Education Code
The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the people and of the state that there be a general diffusion of knowledge and intelligence through the establishment and operation of public libraries. Such diffusion is a matter of general concern inasmuch as it is the duty of the state to provide encouragement to the voluntary lifelong learning of the people of the state.

The Legislature further declares that the public library is a supplement to the formal system of free public education, and a source of information and inspiration to persons of all ages, and a resource for continuing education and reeducation beyond the years of formal education, and as such deserves adequate financial support from government at all levels.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19301.

There is in the state government an agency known as the California State Library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

The California State Library is under the control of an executive who shall be a technically trained librarian and shall be known as the “State Librarian.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 10.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

The State Librarian shall be appointed by and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19306.

The State Librarian shall nominate a Deputy State Librarian to be appointed by, and hold office at the pleasure of, the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 11.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19307.

As used in this chapter, “public library” means any public library as defined in this code, or any county law library established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   (SB 711)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [19320. - 19328.]

19320.

The State Librarian may do all of the following:

(a) Make rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the government of the California State Library.

(b) Appoint or employ civil service personnel as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Sell or exchange duplicate copies of books.

(d) Purchase and maintain materials and equipment as necessary to carry out California State Library programs and services consistent with well-established library standards.

(e) Prescribe rules and regulations permitting persons other than Members of the Legislature and other state officers to have the use of books from the California State Library.

(f) Collect and preserve statistics and other information pertaining to libraries, which shall be available to other libraries within the state applying for the information.

(g) Establish, in the State Librarian’s discretion, deposit stations in various parts of the state, under the control of an officer or employee of the California State Library. A book shall not be kept permanently away from the main library, which may be required for official use. Books and other materials that are not required by law to be delivered to or filed with another agency from public libraries and other cultural heritage institutions of the state may be accepted for deposit, under agreements entered into by the
 State Librarian and the libraries or institutions concerned, whereby materials that should be preserved but are rarely used in the region may be stored and made available for use under the same conditions that apply to materials in the California State Library. Cultural heritage institutions include, but are not limited to, archives, galleries, historical societies, libraries, museums, and tribal nations.

(h) Collect, preserve, and disseminate information regarding the history of the state, including materials that represent the stories of Californians in an equal, diverse, and inclusive manner.

(i) Authorize the California State Library to serve as regional library for the blind and print disabled, in cooperation with the Library of Congress.

(j) Give advisory, consultive, and technical assistance with respect to
 public libraries to librarians and library authorities, and assist all other authorities, state and local, in assuming their full responsibility for library services.

(k) Authorize the California State Library to serve as the central reference and research library for the departments of state government and maintain adequate legislative reference and research library services for the Legislature, and to maintain and make accessible, through digital or physical means, the publications created by state government.

(l) Acquire, organize, and supply books and other library informational and reference materials to supplement the collections of other public libraries of the state with the more technical, scientific, and scholarly works, to the end that through an established interlibrary loan system, the people of the state shall have access to the full range of reference and
 informational materials.

(m) Make studies and surveys of public library needs and adopt rules and regulations for the allocation of federal funds to public libraries.

(n) Contract, at the State Librarian’s discretion, with other public libraries in the state to give public services of the types referred to in subdivisions (g) and (l), when service by contract appears to be a needed supplement to the facilities and services carried on directly by the California State Library.

(o) Digitally preserve books and other physical materials and provide a digital platform to expand access to the California State Library’s collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 12.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19320.5.

The State Librarian may employ consultants to provide technical assistance to public libraries in the development and enhancement of library services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 13.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19321.

The State Librarian shall also do all of the following:

(a) Purchase books, maps, engravings, paintings, furniture, and other materials and equipment necessary to carry out California State Library programs and services.

(b) Number and stamp all books and maps belonging to the library, or otherwise indicate ownership of them, and keep a catalog thereof.

(c) Have bound all books and papers that require binding.

(d) Keep a register of all books taken from the library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 14.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19322.

The State Librarian may do both of the following:

(a) Contract directly with counties, cities, or districts within this state, agencies of the state, and agencies of the United States government for the purpose of providing library services.

(b) Establish and operate library service centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 15.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19323.

The State Librarian shall make available in the state on a loan basis to blind or print disabled persons, or to persons with a disability that prevents them from reading conventional printed materials, audio recordings of books and other related materials. The materials to be made into audio recordings shall be selected by the California State Library on the same basis as the California State Library’s collection development plan, which shall be posted on the California State Library’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 16.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19324.

The State Librarian may consider for rendering into embossed braille any print books and other materials, excluding textbooks, requested by an eligible patron with print disabilities. Consideration of the patron’s request shall be dependent upon available staffing, resources, and technical proficiency at the time of the request. Books and other materials rendered into embossed braille pursuant to this section may be placed in the California State Library’s circulating collection for use by all patrons with print disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 17.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19325.

The State Librarian may provide the following:

(a) Toll-free and local telephone services for registered patrons of the federally designated regional libraries for the blind and print disabled, in order to enable those persons to have direct patron access to library services.

(b) Toll-free and local telephone access to telephonic reading systems for individuals with print disabilities who are registered patrons of the federally designated regional libraries for the blind and print disabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 18.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19325.1.

(a) The State Librarian may operate a telephonic reading system, fund the operation of telephonic reading systems operated by qualifying entities, or both.

(b) Pursuant to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act and in accordance with Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, the telephonic reading system is to be funded from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund.

(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless otherwise indicated:

(1) “Telephonic reading system” means a system operated by the State Librarian or a
 qualifying entity, whereby a caller can hear the reading of material such as newspapers, magazines, newsletters, broadcast media schedules, transit route and schedule information, and other reference or time-sensitive materials, as determined by the operator of the system.

(2) “Qualifying entity” means any agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state or any nonprofit organization whose primary mission is to provide services to people who are blind or visually impaired.

(d) Qualifying entities that were eligible, as of January 1, 2001, to receive funds from the State Librarian relating to the operation of a telephonic reading system may continue to receive funding from the State Librarian.

(e) The State Librarian, in cooperation with qualifying entities, may expand the type and scope of materials
 available on telephonic reading systems in order to meet the local, regional, or world language needs of print-disabled residents of this state. The State Librarian may also expand the scope of services and availability of telephonic reading services by current methods and technologies or by methods and technologies that may be developed. The State Librarian may inform current and potential patrons of the availability of telephonic reading service through appropriate means, including, but not limited to, direct mailings, direct telephonic contact, and public service announcements.

(f) The State Librarian may enter into contracts or other agreements that he or she determines to be appropriate to provide telephonic reading services pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19326.

(a) The State Librarian may annually award a gold medal for excellence in the humanities and science to an individual or organization for publication of a work that has enriched the collection of the California State Library and enriched the state by significantly contributing to the intellectual, cultural, and scientific knowledge of the people of the state.

(b) The award shall formally be known as the “California State Library Gold Medal for Excellence in the Humanities and Science.”

(c) To assist in making the selection of a recipient of the California State Library Gold Medal for Excellence in the Humanities and Science, the State Librarian shall consult an
 advisory panel consisting of one representative from each of the following:

(1) The Governor.

(2) The President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(3) The Speaker of the Assembly.

(4) The Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court.

(d) The State Librarian may seek private contributions to defray the cost of awarding the California State Library Gold Medal for Excellence in the Humanities and Science and related expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 19.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19327.

(a) In order to protect and preserve valuable and irreplaceable treasures of the state, the State Librarian may enter into an operating agreement with a private, nonprofit, tax-exempt organization, currently known as the California State Library Foundation, as follows:

(1) The California State Library Foundation may be designated by the State Librarian as the only authorized provider of copies and reproductions of rare and valuable State Library materials.

(2) The California State Library Foundation may be authorized by the State Librarian to provide copies and reproductions of documents and other information found in the collection of the State Library, as requested by members of the public.

(3) The California State Library Foundation may be authorized by the State Librarian to use State Library facilities and equipment designated by the State Librarian as necessary for the California State Library Foundation to provide services to the State Library efficiently and economically.

(b) The State Librarian may establish an agreement with the California State Library Foundation to collect fees from the public for providing the services specified in subdivision (a). Fees for copying, reproduction, and other services provided by the California State Library Foundation shall be at a level consistent with the cost of providing these services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 213, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19328.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that Bernard E. Witkin’s legendary contribution to California law is deserving of a lasting tribute and an expression of gratitude from the state whose legal system, he, more than any other single individual in the 20th century, helped to shape.

(b) The law library of the California State Library, located in the Library and Courts Building in the City and County of Sacramento, is hereby designated as the Bernard E. Witkin State Law Library of California.

(c) The State Librarian, in cooperation with the Department of General Services, may install appropriate plaques and markers showing this special designation upon receiving donations from nonstate resources to cover any costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Books [19330. - 19334.]

19330.

Books may be taken from the California State Library by the Members of the Legislature and by other state officers during regular office hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 20.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19331.

The Controller, when notified by the State Librarian that any officer or employee of the state for whom he or she draws a warrant for salary has failed to return any book taken by him or her, or for which he or she has given an order, within the time prescribed by the rules, or the time within which it was agreed to be returned, and which notice shall give the value of the book, shall, after first informing the officer or employee of the notice, upon failure by him or her to return the book, deduct from the warrant for the salary of the officer or employee, twice the value of the book, and place the amount deducted in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

19332.

In case of the neglect or refusal on the part of any officer or employee of the state to return a book for which he or she has given an order or a receipt or has in his or her possession, the State Librarian may purchase for the library a duplicate of the book, and notify the Controller of the purchase, together with the cost of the book. Upon the receipt of the notice from the department, the Controller shall deduct twice the cost of the duplicate book from the warrant for the salary of the officer or employee, and place the amount deducted in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 123.)
-------------------------------------------

19333.

The State Librarian may bring suit in his or her official capacity for the recovery of any book, or for three times the value thereof, together with costs of suit, against any person who has the book in his or her possession or who is responsible therefor. If the department has purchased a duplicate of any book, it may bring suit for three times the amount expended for the duplicate, together with costs of suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

19334.

Every person who injures or fails to return any book taken is liable in three times its value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reading Initiative Program [19335. - 19336.]

19335.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Reading Initiative Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19336.

The State Librarian shall establish the Reading Initiative Program with funds appropriated for that purpose and with funds received from private sources. The State Librarian shall administer the program, for which purpose he or she shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop a list of recommended books, in consultation with various groups, including, but not limited to, teachers, librarians, parents, writers, publishers, and employees of the State Department of Education. The recommended books shall supplement the state-recommended English/language arts curriculum framework, and shall include recreational reading selections for children.

(b) Develop a method of involving pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in the program and an appropriate form of recognition for pupils who volunteer to participate in the program and who succeed in the program. Rewards and related recognition activities shall be funded with amounts received from private sources.

(c) To the extent private funds are available, and consistent with subdivision (b), expend private funds received by the State Librarian for the purposes of this article to obtain and make available to the public the books on the list developed pursuant to subdivision (a) .

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Local Public Library Partnership Program [19340. - 19345.]

19340.

The Local Public Library Partnership Program is hereby established under the administration of the State Librarian for purposes of ensuring that, by third grade, all pupils have access to a local public library.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.   (SB 321)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19341.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) (1) “Local public library” means a public library formed pursuant to this part that is located within the elementary school attendance area in which a schoolsite of a local educational agency is located.

(2) If no public library is located within the elementary school attendance area in which a schoolsite of a local educational agency is located, the closest public library formed pursuant to this part that is within the elementary or unified school district in which a
 schoolsite is located shall be considered the local public library.

(3) If no public library is located within the elementary or unified school district in which a schoolsite of a local educational agency is located, the closest public library formed pursuant to this part that is within the county in which a schoolsite is located shall be considered the local public library.

(c) “Student success card” means a card issued by a local public library that provides access to library services, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Collections that support school curriculum as well as pupil leisure reading, online research, and learning resources maintained by local public libraries and the California State Library.

(2) Online tutoring,
 where available.

(3) Digital content from the California State Library’s K–12 Online Resources Project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 8.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19342.

(a) The State Librarian shall offer resources to assist each local public library to find student success card dispensing strategies that work best for their communities.

(b) The State Librarian shall coordinate with each local public library to determine the most effective means to ensure each pupil in each local educational agency is provided with the opportunity to obtain a student success card by third grade, including, but not limited to, by working with a school administrator or school librarian.

(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the State Librarian shall ensure that partnerships between local public libraries and local educational agencies have been established to enable each pupil enrolled at a
 schoolsite of each local educational agency to be provided with the opportunity to obtain a student success card by third grade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 9.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19343.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the State Librarian shall, on or before January 1, 2029, and by each January 1 thereafter, report to the Legislature all of the following information:

(1) The number of third grade pupils who have obtained a student success card.

(2) The number of third grade pupils who received local public library access as a result of the partnerships developed pursuant to this article.

(3) The number of new summer readers each local public library received during the summer months each year.

(4) Any measurable increases to the
 use of other library resources as a result of the partnerships developed pursuant to this article.

(b) A report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 10.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19344.

Consistent with Section 99.37 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a local educational agency may disclose directory information, as defined in Section 49061, to the State Librarian and a local public library for purposes of administering this article. The information shall not be used for any other purpose or given or transferred to any other person or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 11.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19345.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a local public library from partnering with a local educational agency to issue student success cards to pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.   (SB 321)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Statewide Imagination Library Program [19350. - 19354.]

19350.

The Statewide Imagination Library Program is hereby established under the administration of the State Librarian for purposes of developing, implementing, promoting, and fostering a comprehensive statewide initiative for encouraging children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, to develop a love of reading and learning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.   (SB 1183)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19351.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund which shall be known as the Imagination Library of California Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited in the fund, including state General Fund appropriations, public or private bequeaths, donations, gifts, or grants, and any federal funds, are continuously appropriated to the California State Library for purposes of this article.

(b) Moneys from the fund shall be used to provide age-appropriate books on a monthly basis, at home, to each child registered in the program, from birth to their fifth birthday, inclusive, at no cost to families, through Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library.

(c) (1) Moneys from the fund shall be allocated to qualified local entities that agree to a dollar-for-dollar match for purposes of the program.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the State Librarian may waive the dollar-for-dollar match requirement for a qualified local entity on a case-by-case
 basis to prevent undue financial hardship.

(d) For purposes of this section, “qualified local entity” means any existing or new local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library affiliate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.   (SB 1183)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19352.

The State Librarian shall coordinate with a nonprofit entity, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and organized solely to promote and encourage reading by the children of the state, for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.   (SB 1183)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19353.

The State Librarian shall do all of the following:

(a) Promote the statewide development of local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs.

(b) Advance and strengthen local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs with the goal of increasing enrollment.

(c) Recruit volunteers to assist in the development, promotion, and coordination of the programs.

(d) Solicit donations, gifts, and other funding to financially support local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs.

(e) Develop community engagement.

(f) Develop, promote, and coordinate a public awareness campaign to make donors aware of the opportunity to donate to the affiliate programs and make the public aware of the opportunity to register eligible children to receive books through the program.

(g) Administer the local match requirement and coordinate the collection and remittance of local program costs for books and mailing.

(h) Develop statewide marketing and communication plans.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, report to the Legislature, by January 1,
 2028, and annually thereafter, on all of the following:

(A) The deposits made to, and expenditures made from, the Imagination Library of California Fund.

(B) Whether any local match requirements were waived.

(C) How many local programs exist, where they are located, and which entity or organization serves as the local partner.

(D) How many children are enrolled and how many books have been sent to enrolled children.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.   (SB 1183)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19354.

The California State Library may promulgate regulations as may be needed for the administration of the Statewide Imagination Library Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.   (SB 1183)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Library Districts [19400. - 19532.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation, Annexation, Dissolution [19400. - 19407.]

19400.

A library district may be organized, as provided in this chapter. The library district may establish, equip, and maintain a public library for the dissemination of knowledge of the arts, sciences, and general literature and may exercise the powers granted or necessarily implied pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

The library district may include incorporated or unincorporated territory, or both, in any one or more counties, so long as the territory of the district consists of contiguous parcels and the territory of no city is divided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

Whenever the formation of a library district is desired, a petition which may consist of any number of instruments, may be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest proportionate value of the lands within the proposed district as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll. The petition shall specify whether the proposed library district shall be governed by a three-member board of library trustees or by a five-member board of library trustees. The board of supervisors to whom the petition is presented is designated in this chapter as the supervising board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.

The petition shall be signed by registered voters residing within the proposed library district equal in number to at least 5 percent of the number of votes cast in the territory comprising the proposed district at the last preceding general state election at which a Governor was elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19404.

The proceedings for the filing and hearing of the petition are governed and controlled by the provisions of Sections 58032, 58033, 58034, 58060, and 58061 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19405.

The proceedings for final hearing of the petition and the formation of the district are governed and controlled by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 58090), Article 5 (commencing with Section 58130), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 58200) of Chapter 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19406.

On the filing of written protests by registered voters residing in the proposed district equal in number to at least 50 percent of the number of votes cast in the territory comprising the proposed district at the last preceding general state election at which a Governor was elected, the proceeding for the formation of the district shall be terminated as provided in Sections 58103 and 58104 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19407.

No library district including territory in more than one county shall be organized under this chapter without the concurrent consent by resolution of each board of supervisors involved, as well as the consent of the governing body of each city to be included.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Trustees [19420. - 19432.]

19420.

Within 30 days after the filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors or county board of supervisors of the resolution declaring the organization of the district, the supervising board of supervisors shall appoint the required number of library trustees from the district at large.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19421.

The governing board of the district shall be called “the Board of Library Trustees of ____ Library District” (inserting the name of the particular district).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19422.

The trustee shall hold office for the term of four years beginning on the last Friday in November next succeeding their appointment or election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------

19423.

The first board of library trustees appointed or elected in a district shall at their first meeting so classify themselves by lot that their terms shall expire:

(a) For three-member boards, one on the last Friday in November of the first odd-numbered calendar year next succeeding his or her appointment or election, and two on the last Friday in November of the second succeeding odd-numbered calendar year.

(b) For five-member boards, two on the last Friday in November of the first odd-numbered calendar year next succeeding his or her appointment or election, and three on the last Friday in November of the second succeeding odd-numbered calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

19424.

At its first meeting called after the original appointment of the board, and annually thereafter at its first meeting called after the last Friday in November in odd-numbered years, the board shall organize by electing one of its number president, and another one of its number secretary. They shall serve as such for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------

19425.

The board shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept, and at the first meeting of the board of trustees of the library district, it shall immediately cause to be made out and filed with the State Librarian a certificate showing that the library district has been established, with the date thereof, the names of the trustees, and the officers of the board chosen for the current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

19426.

A vacancy in the board of library trustees shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the supervising board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19427.

Each library trustee shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19428.

The board of library trustees shall meet at least once a month, at such time and place as it may fix by resolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19429.

Special meetings may be called at any time, as follows:

(a) A special meeting of a three-member board of library trustees may be called by two trustees, by written notices served upon each member at least 12 hours before the time specified for the meeting.

(b) A special meeting of a five-member board of library trustees may be called by three trustees, by written notices served upon each member at least 12 hours before the time specified for the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

19430.

(a) For three-member boards, two members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(b) For five-member boards, three members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

19431.

A proposal to increase the number of seats on the board of library trustees from three to five may be initiated in either of the following alternative ways:

(a) By a petition signed by registered voters residing within the library district equal in number to at least 5 percent of the total number of votes cast in the library district at the last preceding general state election at which a Governor was elected, and filed with the supervising board of supervisors of the library district.

(b) By a resolution adopted by the board of trustees and filed with the supervising board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

19432.

(a) The supervising board of supervisors, at its option, may conduct a public hearing on a petition or resolution filed pursuant to Section 19431. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Sections 6060 and 6061. At the hearing, any interested person shall be given an opportunity to present his or her views on the proposal. At the conclusion of the hearing, the supervising board of supervisors may increase the board of library trustees to a five member board.

(b) If the board of library trustees is increased from three to five members, the supervising board of supervisors shall appoint the two additional trustees from the district at large, and the trustees shall classify themselves by lot so that their terms shall expire as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 19423.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 354, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers [19460. - 19483.]

19460.

The board of library trustees shall make and enforce all rules, regulations, and bylaws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the library under its management, and all property belonging to the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19460.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19461.

The board of library trustees shall administer any trust declared or created for the library, and received by gift, devise, or bequest, and hold in trust or otherwise, property situated in this state or elsewhere, and where not otherwise provided, dispose of the property for the benefit of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19462.

The board of library trustees shall prescribe the duties and powers of the librarian, secretary, and other officers and employees of the library, determine the number of and appoint all officers and employees, and fix their compensation. The officers and employees shall hold their offices and positions at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19463.

The board of library trustees shall purchase necessary books, journals, publications, and other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19464.
